src/taghacks/rewrite-ftb3.regex
# Remove these analyses before hash signs
[  % A -> 0,
% N% Abbr -> 0,
% Abbr -> 0,
% Nom -> 0,
% Par -> 0,
% Gen -> 0,
% Ine -> 0,
% Ela -> 0,
% Ill -> 0,
% Ade -> 0,
% Abl -> 0,
% All -> 0,
% Ess -> 0,
% Ins -> 0,
% Abe -> 0,
% Tra -> 0,
% Com -> 0,
% Digit -> 0,
% Ord -> 0,
% N -> 0,
% Num -> 0,
% Pl -> 0,
% Prop -> 0,
% Sg -> 0,
% V -> 0 || _ ?* %#  ]
.o.
# Remove V before Prc
[ % V -> 0 || _ [ % PrsPrc | % PrfPrc | % NegPrc | % AgPrc | % PrsPrc% Act | % PrfPrc% Act | % PrsPrc% Pass | % PrfPrc% Pass ] ] 
.o.
# Pr? Po? Let the context decide!
[ % Po (->) % Pr ]
.o.
[ % Adp% Po (->) % Adp % Pr ] 
.o.
# "neat" way to mangle compound analyses
[ %<Del%>→ 
[ a | b | c | d | e | f | g | h | i | j | k | l | m | n | o | p | q | r | s
| t | u | v | w | x | y | z | å | ä | ö ]*
  ←%<Del%>  -> 0 || _ [? - %#]* %# ]
.o.
[ %<Del%>→ -> 0, ←%<Del%> -> 0 ]
.o.
[ a | b | c | d | e | f | g | h | i | j | k | l | m | n | o | p | q | r | s
| t | u | v | w | x | y | z | å | ä | ö ]* -> 0 ||
[% N | % Num ]+ [? - %#]* _ [? - %#]*  
.o.
# Puncts are like that
[ % Nom % Sg] -> 0 || % Punct _
.o.
# 
% Punct (->) % Abbr % Nom % Sg || _ ;
